New York, session 2025-2026, A10474.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new 2 section 60.23 to read as follows: 3 § 60.23 Rules of evidence; confidential informants. 4 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall have the 5 following meanings: 6 (a) "Confidential informant" means a person who cooperates with a law 7 enforcement agency confidentially in order to protect the person or the 8 agency's intelligence gathering or investigative efforts and: 9 (i) Seeks to avoid arrest or prosecution for a crime, or mitigate 10 punishment for a crime in which a sentence will be or has been imposed; 11 and 12 (ii) Is able, by reason of their familiarity or close association with 13 suspected criminals, to: 14 (A) Make a controlled buy or controlled sale of contraband, controlled 15 substances, or other items that are material to a criminal investi- 16 gation; 17 (B) Supply regular or constant information about suspected or actual 18 criminal activities to a law enforcement agency; or 19 (C) Otherwise provide information important to ongoing criminal intel- 20 ligence gathering or criminal investigative efforts. 21 (b) "Controlled buy" means the purchase of contraband, controlled 22 substances, or other items that are material to a criminal investigation 23 from a target offender which is initiated, managed, overseen or partic- 24 ipated in by law enforcement personnel with the knowledge of a confiden- 25 tial informant. 26 (c) "Controlled sale" means the sale of contraband, controlled 27 substances, or other items that are material to a criminal investigation 28 to a target offender which is initiated, managed, overseen, or partic- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00786-01-5 A. 10474 2 1 ipated in by law enforcement personnel with the knowledge of a confiden- 2 tial informant. 3 (d) "Law enforcement agency" means any agency having a primary mission 4 of preventing and detecting crime and the enforcement of the penal, 5 criminal, traffic, or highway laws of the state and that in furtherance 6 of that primary mission employs law enforcement officers. 7 (e) "Target offender" means the person suspected by law enforcement 8 personnel to be implicated in criminal acts by the activities of a 9 confidential informant. 10 2. A law enforcement agency that uses confidential informants shall: 11 (a) Inform each person who is requested to serve as a confidential 12 informant that the agency cannot promise inducements such as a grant of 13 immunity, dropped or reduced charges, or reduced sentences or placement 14 on probation in exchange for serving as a confidential informant. 15 (b) Inform each person who is requested to serve as a confidential 16 informant that the value of such person's assistance as a confidential 17 informant and any effect that assistance may have on pending criminal 18 matters can be determined only by the appropriate legal authority. 19 (c) Each person who is solicited to act as a confidential informant 20 must be given the opportunity to consult with legal counsel before 21 entering into a substantial assistance agreement. If the person is not 22 represented by legal counsel at the time of the solicitation, the law 23 enforcement agency must advise the person of their right to consult with 24 legal counsel before entering into the substantial assistance agreement. 25 (d) Ensure that all personnel who are involved in the use or recruit- 26 ment of confidential informants are trained in the law enforcement agen- 27 cy's policies and procedures. The agency shall keep documentation demon- 28 strating the date of such training. 29 (e) Adopt policies and procedures that assign the highest priority in 30 operational decisions and actions to the preservation of the safety of 31 confidential informants, law enforcement personnel, target offenders, 32 and the public. 33 3. A law enforcement agency that uses confidential informants shall 34 establish policies and procedures addressing the recruitment, control 35 and use of confidential informants. The policies and procedures shall 36 state the: 37 (a) Information that the law enforcement agency shall maintain 38 concerning each confidential informant; 39 (b) General guidelines for handling confidential informants; 40 (c) Process to advise a confidential informant of conditions, 41 restrictions, and procedures associated with participating in the agen- 42 cy's investigative or intelligence gathering activities; 43 (d) Designated supervisory or command level review and oversight in 44 the use of a confidential informant; 45 (e) Limits or restrictions on off-duty association or social relation- 46 ships by agency personnel involved in investigative or intelligence 47 gathering with confidential informants; 48 (f) Guidelines to deactivate confidential informants, including guide- 49 lines for deactivating communications with confidential informants; and 50 (g) Level of supervisory approval required before a juvenile is used 51 as a confidential informant. 52 4. A law enforcement agency that uses confidential informants shall 53 establish policies and procedures to assess the suitability of using a 54 person as a confidential informant by considering the minimum following 55 factors: A. 10474 3 1 (a) The person's age, maturity, youthful offender status, and mental 2 capacity if such person is mentally disabled as such term is defined in 3 subdivision three of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law; 4 (b) The risk the person poses to adversely affect a present or poten- 5 tial investigation or prosecution; 6 (c) The effect upon agency efforts that the disclosure of the person's 7 cooperation in the community may have; 8 (d) Whether the person is a substance abuser or has a history of 9 substance abuse or is in a court-supervised drug treatment program; 10 (e) The risk of physical harm to the person, their immediate family, 11 or close associates as a result of providing information or assistance, 12 or upon the disclosure of the person's assistance to the community; 13 (f) Whether the person has shown any indication of emotional instabil- 14 ity, unreliability or of furnishing false information; 15 (g) The person's criminal history or prior criminal record; and 16 (h) Whether the use of the person is important to or vital to the 17 success of an investigation. 18 5. A law enforcement agency that uses confidential informants shall 19 establish written security procedures that, at a minimum: 20 (a) Provide for the secured retention of any records related to the 21 law enforcement agency's confidential sources, including access to files 22 identifying the identity of confidential sources; 23 (b) Limit availability to records relating to confidential informants 24 to those within the law enforcement agency or law enforcement community 25 having a need to know or review those records, or to those whose access 26 has been required by court process or order; 27 (c) Require notation of each person who accesses such records and the 28 date that the records are accessed; 29 (d) Provide for review and oversight by the law enforcement agency to 30 ensure that the security procedures are followed; and 31 (e) Define the process by which records concerning a confidential 32 informant may be lawfully destroyed. 33 6. A state or local law enforcement agency that uses confidential 34 informants shall perform a periodic review of actual agency confidential 35 informant practices to ensure conformity with the agency's policies and 36 procedures and this section. 37 7. The provisions of this section and policies and procedures adopted 38 pursuant to this section do not grant any right or entitlement to a 39 confidential informant or a person who is requested to be a confidential 40 informant, and any failure to abide by this section may not be relied 41 upon to create any additional right, substantive or procedural, enforce- 42 able at law by a defendant in a criminal proceeding. 43 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 44 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.